Missouri, session 2026, SB1527.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.131, 192.665, 192.667, 197.165,
197.293, and 197.294, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 192.131,
192.665, 192.667, 197.293, and 197.294, to read as follows:
192.131. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) ["Advisory panel", the infection control advisory
panel created by section 197.165;
(2)] "Antibiogram", a record of the resistance of
microbes to various antibiotics;
[(3)] (2) "Antimicrobial", the ability of an agent to
destroy or prevent the development of pathogenic action of a
microorganism;
[(4)] (3) "Department", the department of health and
senior services.
2. Every laboratory performing culture and sensitivity
testing on humans in Missouri shall submit data on health
care associated infections to the department in accordance
with this section. The data to be reported shall be defined
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1527 2
by regulation of the department [after considering the
recommendations of the advisory panel]. Such data may
include antibiograms and, not later than July 1, 2005, shall
include but not be limited to the number of patients or
isolates by hospital, ambulatory surgical center, and other
facility or practice setting with methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) or vancomycin-resistant
enterococcus (VRE).
3. Information on infections collected pursuant to
this section shall be subject to the confidentiality
protections of this chapter but shall be available in
provider-specific form to appropriate facility and
professional licensure authorities.
4. The [advisory panel] department shall [develop a
recommended plan to] use laboratory and health care provider
data provided pursuant to this chapter to create a system to:
(1) Enhance the ability of health care providers and
the department to track the incidence and distribution of
preventable infections, with emphasis on those infections
that are most susceptible to interventions and that pose the
greatest risk of harm to Missouri residents;
(2) Monitor trends in the development of antibiotic-
resistant microbes, including but not limited to methicillin-
resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) and vancomycin-
resistant enterococcus (VRE) infections.
5. In implementing this section, the [advisory panel
and the] department shall conform to guidelines and
standards adopted by the federal Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention. [The advisory panel's plan may provide for
demonstration projects to assess the viability of the
recommended initiatives.]

SB 1527 3
192.665. As used in this section, section 192.667, and
sections 197.150 to [197.165] 197.162, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Charge data", information submitted by health
care providers on current charges for leading procedures and
diagnoses;
(2) "Charges by payer", information submitted by
hospitals on amount billed to Medicare, Medicaid, other
government sources and all nongovernment sources combined as
one data element;
(3) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(4) "Financial data", information submitted by
hospitals drawn from financial statements which includes the
balance sheet, income statement, charity care and bad debt
and charges by payer, prepared in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles;
(5) "Health care provider", hospitals as defined in
section 197.020 and ambulatory surgical centers and abortion
facilities as defined in section 197.200;
(6) "Nosocomial infection", as defined by the federal
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and applied to
infections within hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers,
abortion facilities, and other facilities;
(7) "Nosocomial infection incidence rate", a risk-
adjusted measurement of new cases of nosocomial infections
by procedure or device within a population over a given
period of time, with such measurements defined by rule of
the department pursuant to subsection 3 of section 192.667
for use by all hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers,
abortion facilities, and other facilities in complying with

SB 1527 4
the requirements of the Missouri nosocomial infection
control act of 2004;
(8) "Other facility", a type of facility determined to
be a source of infections and designated by rule of the
department pursuant to subsection 11 of section 192.667;
(9) "Patient abstract data", data submitted by
hospitals which includes but is not limited to date of
birth, sex, race, zip code, county of residence, admission
date, discharge date, principal and other diagnoses,
including external causes, principal and other procedures,
procedure dates, total billed charges, disposition of the
patient and expected source of payment with sources
categorized according to Medicare, Medicaid, other
government, workers' compensation, all commercial payors
coded with a common code, self-pay, no charge and other.
192.667. 1. All health care providers shall at least
annually provide to the department charge data as required
by the department. All hospitals shall at least annually
provide patient abstract data and financial data as required
by the department. Hospitals as defined in section 197.020
shall report patient abstract data for outpatients and
inpatients. Ambulatory surgical centers and abortion
facilities as defined in section 197.200 shall provide
patient abstract data to the department. The department
shall specify by rule the types of information which shall
be submitted and the method of submission.
2. The department shall collect data on the incidence
of health care-associated infections from hospitals,
ambulatory surgical centers, abortion facilities, and other
facilities as necessary to generate the reports required by
this section. Hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers,
abortion facilities, and other facilities shall provide such

SB 1527 5
data in compliance with this section. In order to
streamline government and to eliminate duplicative reporting
requirements, if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, or its successor entity, requires hospitals to
submit health care-associated infection data, then hospitals
and the department shall not be required to comply with the
health care-associated infection data reporting requirements
of subsections 2 to 17 of this section applicable to
hospitals, except that the department shall post a link on
its website to publicly reported data by hospitals on the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Hospital Compare
website, or its successor.
3. The department shall promulgate rules specifying
the standards and procedures for the collection, analysis,
risk adjustment, and reporting of the incidence of health
care-associated infections and the types of infections and
procedures to be monitored pursuant to subsection 13 of this
section. In promulgating such rules, the department shall[:
(1)] use methodologies and systems for data collection
established by the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention's National Healthcare Safety Network, or its
successor[; and
(2) Consider the findings and recommendations of the
infection control advisory panel established pursuant to
section 197.165].
4. [By January 1, 2017, the infection control advisory
panel created by section 197.165 shall make recommendations
to] The department [regarding] shall assess the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services' health care-associated
infection data collection, analysis, and public reporting
requirements for hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and
other facilities in the federal Centers for Disease Control

SB 1527 6
and Prevention's National Healthcare Safety Network, or its
successor, in lieu of all or part of the data collection,
analysis, and public reporting requirements of this
section. The [advisory panel recommendations] department
shall address which hospitals shall be required as a
condition of licensure to use the National Healthcare Safety
Network for data collection; the use of the National
Healthcare Safety Network for risk adjustment and analysis
of hospital submitted data; and the use of the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services' Hospital Compare website, or
its successor, for public reporting of the incidence of
health care-associated infection metrics. [The advisory
panel shall consider the following factors in developing its
recommendation:
(1) Whether the public is afforded the same or greater
access to facility-specific infection control indicators and
metrics;
(2) Whether the data provided to the public is subject
to the same or greater accuracy of risk adjustment;
(3) Whether the public is provided with the same or
greater specificity of reporting of infections by type of
facility infections and procedures;
(4) Whether the data is subject to the same or greater
level of confidentiality of the identity of an individual
patient;
(5) Whether the National Healthcare Safety Network, or
its successor, has the capacity to receive, analyze, and
report the required data for all facilities;
(6) Whether the cost to implement the National
Healthcare Safety Network infection data collection and
reporting system is the same or less.]

SB 1527 7
5. [After considering the recommendations of the
infection control advisory panel, and provided that the
requirements of subsection 13 of this section can be met,]
The department shall implement guidelines from the federal
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's National
Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor. It shall be a
condition of licensure for hospitals that meet the minimum
public reporting requirements of the National Healthcare
Safety Network and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to participate in the National Healthcare Safety
Network, or its successor. Such hospitals shall permit the
National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, to
disclose facility-specific infection data to the department
as required under this section, and as necessary to provide
the public reports required by the department. It shall be
a condition of licensure for any ambulatory surgical center
or abortion facility which does not voluntarily participate
in the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor,
to submit facility-specific data to the department as
100 required under this section, and as necessary to provide the
101 public reports required by the department.
102 6. The department shall not require the resubmission
103 of data which has been submitted to the department of health
104 and senior services or the department of social services
105 under any other provision of law. The department of health
106 and senior services shall accept data submitted by
107 associations or related organizations on behalf of health
108 care providers by entering into binding agreements
109 negotiated with such associations or related organizations
110 to obtain data required pursuant to section 192.665 and this
111 section. A health care provider shall submit the required
112 information to the department of health and senior services:

SB 1527 8
113 (1) If the provider does not submit the required data
114 through such associations or related organizations;
115 (2) If no binding agreement has been reached within
116 ninety days of August 28, 1992, between the department of
117 health and senior services and such associations or related
118 organizations; or
119 (3) If a binding agreement has expired for more than
120 ninety days.
121 7. Information obtained by the department under the
122 provisions of section 192.665 and this section shall not be
123 public information. Reports and studies prepared by the
124 department based upon such information shall be public
125 information and may identify individual health care
126 providers. The department of health and senior services may
127 authorize the use of the data by other research
128 organizations pursuant to the provisions of section
129 192.067. The department shall not use or release any
130 information provided under section 192.665 and this section
131 which would enable any person to determine any health care
132 provider's negotiated discounts with specific preferred
133 provider organizations or other managed care organizations.
134 The department shall not release data in a form which could
135 be used to identify a patient. Any violation of this
136 subsection is a class A misdemeanor.
137 8. The department shall undertake a reasonable number
138 of studies and publish information, including at least an
139 annual consumer guide, in collaboration with health care
140 providers, business coalitions and consumers based upon the
141 information obtained pursuant to the provisions of section
142 192.665 and this section. The department shall allow all
143 health care providers and associations and related
144 organizations who have submitted data which will be used in

SB 1527 9
145 any publication to review and comment on the publication
146 prior to its publication or release for general use. The
147 publication shall be made available to the public for a
148 reasonable charge.
149 9. Any health care provider which continually and
150 substantially, as these terms are defined by rule, fails to
151 comply with the provisions of this section shall not be
152 allowed to participate in any program administered by the
153 state or to receive any moneys from the state.
154 10. A hospital, as defined in section 197.020,
155 aggrieved by the department's determination of ineligibility
156 for state moneys pursuant to subsection 9 of this section
157 may appeal as provided in section 197.071. An ambulatory
158 surgical center or abortion facility as defined in section
159 197.200 aggrieved by the department's determination of
160 ineligibility for state moneys pursuant to subsection 9 of
161 this section may appeal as provided in section 197.221.
162 11. The department of health may promulgate rules
163 providing for collection of data and publication of the
164 incidence of health care-associated infections for other
165 types of health facilities determined to be sources of
166 infections; except that, physicians' offices shall be exempt
167 from reporting and disclosure of such infections.
168 12. [By January 1, 2017, the advisory panel shall
169 recommend and] The department shall adopt in regulation
170 [with an effective date of no later than January 1, 2018,]
171 the requirements for the reporting of the following types of
172 infections as specified in this subsection:
173 (1) Infections associated with a minimum of four
174 surgical procedures for hospitals and a minimum of two
175 surgical procedures for ambulatory surgical centers that
176 meet the following criteria:

SB 1527 10
177 (a) Are usually associated with an elective surgical
178 procedure. An "elective surgical procedure" is a planned,
179 nonemergency surgical procedure that may be either medically
180 required such as a hip replacement or optional such as
181 breast augmentation;
182 (b) Demonstrate a high priority aspect such as
183 affecting a large number of patients, having a substantial
184 impact for a smaller population, or being associated with
185 substantial cost, morbidity, or mortality; or
186 (c) Are infections for which reports are collected by
187 the National Healthcare Safety Network or its successor;
188 (2) Central line-related bloodstream infections;
189 (3) Health care-associated infections specified for
190 reporting by hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and
191 other health care facilities by the rules of the Centers for
192 Medicare and Medicaid Services to the federal Centers for
193 Disease Control and Prevention's National Healthcare Safety
194 Network, or its successor; and
195 (4) Other categories of infections that may be
196 established by rule by the department.
197 The department[, in consultation with the advisory panel,]
198 shall be authorized to collect and report data on subsets of
199 each type of infection described in this subsection.
200 13. [In consultation with the infection control
201 advisory panel established pursuant to section 197.165,] The
202 department shall develop and disseminate to the public
203 reports based on data compiled for a period of twelve
204 months. Such reports shall be updated [quarterly] at least
205 annually and shall show for each hospital, ambulatory
206 surgical center, abortion facility, and other facility

SB 1527 11
207 metrics on risk-adjusted health care-associated infections
208 under this section.
209 14. The types of infections under subsection 12 of
210 this section to be publicly reported shall be determined by
211 the department by rule and shall be consistent with the
212 infections tracked by the National Healthcare Safety
213 Network, or its successor.
214 15. Reports published pursuant to subsection 13 of
215 this section shall be published and readily accessible on
216 the department's internet website. The reports shall be
217 distributed at least annually to the governor and members of
218 the general assembly. The department shall make such
219 reports available to the public for a period of at least two
220 years.
221 16. [The Hospital Industry Data Institute shall
222 publish a report of Missouri hospitals', ambulatory surgical
223 centers', and abortion facilities' compliance with
224 standardized quality of care measures established by the
225 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for
226 prevention of infections related to surgical procedures. If
227 the Hospital Industry Data Institute fails to do so by July
228 31, 2008, and annually thereafter, the department shall be
229 authorized to collect information from the Centers for
230 Medicare and Medicaid Services or from hospitals, ambulatory
231 surgical centers, and abortion facilities and publish such
232 information in accordance with this section.
233 17.] The data collected or published pursuant to this
234 section shall be available to the department for purposes of
235 licensing hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and
236 abortion facilities pursuant to chapter 197.
237 [18.] 17. The department shall promulgate rules to
238 implement the provisions of section 192.131 and sections

SB 1527 12
239 197.150 to 197.160. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
240 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
241 the authority delegated in this section shall become
242 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
243 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
244 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
245 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
246 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
247 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
248 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
249 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
250 2004, shall be invalid and void.
251 [19. No later than August 28, 2017,] 18. Each
252 hospital, excluding mental health facilities as defined in
253 section 632.005, and each ambulatory surgical center and
254 abortion facility as defined in section 197.200, shall in
255 consultation with its medical staff establish an
256 antimicrobial stewardship program for evaluating the
257 judicious use of antimicrobials, especially antibiotics that
258 are the last line of defense against resistant infections.
259 The hospital's stewardship program and the results of the
260 program shall be monitored and evaluated by hospital quality
261 improvement departments and shall be available upon
262 inspection to the department. At a minimum, the
263 antimicrobial stewardship program shall be designed to
264 evaluate that hospitalized patients receive, in accordance
265 with accepted medical standards of practice, the appropriate
266 antimicrobial, at the appropriate dose, at the appropriate
267 time, and for the appropriate duration.
268 [20.] 19. Hospitals described in subsection [19] 18 of
269 this section shall meet the National Healthcare Safety
270 Network requirements for reporting antimicrobial usage or

SB 1527 13
271 resistance by using the Centers for Disease Control and
272 Prevention's Antimicrobial Use and Resistance (AUR) Module
273 when conditions of participation promulgated by the Centers
274 for Medicare and Medicaid Services requiring the electronic
275 reporting of antibiotic use or antibiotic resistance by
276 hospitals become effective. When such antimicrobial usage
277 or resistance reporting takes effect, hospitals shall
278 authorize the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its
279 successor, to disclose to the department facility-specific
280 information reported to the AUR Module. Facility-specific
281 data on antibiotic usage and resistance collected under this
282 subsection shall not be disclosed to the public, but the
283 department may release case-specific information to other
284 facilities, physicians, and the public if the department
285 determines on a case-by-case basis that the release of such
286 information is necessary to protect persons in a public
287 health emergency. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
288 hospital from voluntarily reporting antibiotic use or
289 antibiotic resistance data through the National Healthcare
290 Safety Network, or its successor, prior to the effective
291 date of the conditions of participation requiring the
292 reporting.
293 [21.] 20. The department shall make a report to the
294 general assembly beginning January 1, 2018, and on every
295 January first thereafter on the incidence, type, and
296 distribution of antimicrobial-resistant infections
297 identified in the state and within regions of the state.
197.293. 1. In addition to the powers established in
sections 197.070 and 197.220, the department of health and
senior services shall use the following standards for
enforcing hospital, ambulatory surgical center, and abortion
facility licensure regulations promulgated to enforce the

SB 1527 14
provisions of sections 197.010 to 197.120, sections 197.150
to [197.165] 197.162, and sections 197.200 to 197.240:
(1) Upon notification of a deficiency in meeting
regulatory standards, the hospital, ambulatory surgical
center, or abortion facility shall develop and implement a
plan of correction approved by the department which
includes, but is not limited to, the specific type of
corrective action to be taken and an estimated time to
complete such action;
(2) If the plan as implemented does not correct the
deficiency, the department may either:
(a) Direct the hospital, ambulatory surgical center,
or abortion facility to develop and implement a plan of
correction pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection; or
(b) Require the hospital, ambulatory surgical center,
or abortion facility to implement a plan of correction
developed by the department;
(3) If there is a continuing deficiency after
implementation of the plan of correction pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection and the hospital,
ambulatory surgical center, or abortion facility has had an
opportunity to correct such deficiency, the department may
restrict new inpatient admissions or outpatient entrants to
the service or services affected by such deficiency;
(4) If there is a continuing deficiency after the
department restricts new inpatient admissions or outpatient
entrants to the service or services pursuant to subdivision
(3) of this subsection and the hospital, ambulatory surgical
center, or abortion facility has had an opportunity to
correct such deficiency, the department may suspend
operations in all or part of the service or services
affected by such deficiency;

SB 1527 15
(5) If there is a continuing deficiency after
suspension of operations pursuant to subdivision (4) of this
subsection, the department may deny, suspend or revoke the
hospital's, ambulatory surgical center's, or abortion
facility's license pursuant to section 197.070 or section
197.220.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section to the contrary, if a deficiency in meeting
licensure standards presents an immediate and serious threat
to the patients' health and safety, the department may,
based on the scope and severity of the deficiency, restrict
access to the service or services affected by the deficiency
until the hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or abortion
facility has developed and implemented an approved plan of
correction. Decisions as to whether a deficiency
constitutes an immediate and serious threat to the patients'
health and safety shall be made in accordance with
guidelines established pursuant to regulation of the
department of health and senior services and such decisions
shall be approved by the bureau of health facility licensing
in the department of health and senior services, or its
successor agency, or by a person authorized by the
regulations to approve such decisions in the absence of the
director.
197.294. No information disclosed by the department to
the public pursuant to sections 192.019, 192.020, 192.067,
192.131, 192.138, 192.665, and 192.667, and sections
197.150, 197.152, 197.154, 197.156, 197.158, 197.160,
197.162, [197.165,] and 197.293 shall be used to establish a
standard of care in a private civil action.
[197.165. 1. The department shall appoint
an "Infection Control Advisory Panel" for the

SB 1527 16
purposes of implementing sections 192.131 and
192.667.
2. Members of the infection control
advisory panel shall include:
(1) Two public members;
(2) Three board-certified or board-
eligible physicians licensed pursuant to chapter
334 who are affiliated with a Missouri hospital
or medical school, active members of the Society
for Health Care Epidemiology of America, and
have demonstrated interest and expertise in
health facility infection control;
(3) One physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 334 who is active in the practice of
medicine in Missouri and who holds medical staff
privileges at a Missouri hospital;
(4) Four infection control practitioners
certified by the certification board of
infection control and epidemiology, at least two
of whom shall be practicing in a rural hospital
or setting and at least two of whom shall be
registered professional nurses licensed under
chapter 335;
(5) A medical statistician with an
advanced degree in such specialty;
(6) A clinical microbiologist with an
advanced degree in such specialty;
(7) Three employees of the department,
representing the functions of hospital,
ambulatory surgical center, and abortion
facility licensure, epidemiology and health data
analysis, who shall serve as ex officio
nonvoting members of the panel.
3. Reasonable expenses of the panel shall
be paid from private donations made specifically
for that purpose to the "Infection Control
Advisory Panel Fund", which is hereby created in
the state treasury. If such donations are not
received from private sources, then the
provisions of this act shall be implemented
without the advisory panel.]
✓